Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.250

Streets and alleys over first-class tidelands—Control of.

All streets and alleys, which have been heretofore or may hereafter be established upon, or across tide and shore lands of the first class shall be under the supervision and control of the cities within whose corporate limits such tide and shore lands are situated, to the same extent as are all other streets and alleys of such cities.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.21.250. Prior: 1901 c 149 s 1; RRS s 9295.]